Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-988
Increased capitation payments; commencement.

To the extent federal approval is obtained, the increased capitation payments under section 68-983 may commence for dates of service on or after January 1, 2026.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB380, § 6.